Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; IDENTITY VERIFICATION SOFTWARE.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for acquisition, implementation, support, and maintenance of automated identity verification systems to combat enrollment fraud. new text end